Utah statutes.
31A-2-218.   Strategic plan for health system reform.
The commissioner and the department shall:
(1)  work with the Governor's Office of Economic Development, the Department
of Health, the Department of Workforce Services, and the Legislature to
develop health system reform in accordance with the strategic plan described
in Title 63M, Chapter 1, Part 25, Health System Reform Act;
(2)  work with health insurers in accordance with Section 31A-22-635 to
develop standards for health insurance applications and compatible electronic
systems;
(3)  facilitate a private sector method for the collection of health insurance
premium payments made for a single policy by multiple payers, including the
policyholder, one or more employers of one or more individuals covered by the
policy, government programs, and others by educating employers and insurers
about collection services available through private vendors, including
financial institutions;
(4)  encourage health insurers to develop products that:
(a)  encourage health care providers to follow best practice protocols;
(b)  incorporate other health care quality improvement mechanisms; and
(c)  incorporate rewards and incentives for healthy lifestyles and behaviors
as permitted by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act;
(5)  involve the Office of Consumer Health Assistance created in Section
31A-2-216, as necessary, to accomplish the requirements of this section; and
(6)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, make rules, as necessary, to implement Subsections (2), (3), and (4).
